Utah statutes.
20A-11-103.   Notice of pending interim and summary reports -- Form of submission -- Public availability.

(1) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (1)(b), 10 days before an interim report or summary report is due under this chapter or Chapter 12, Part 2, Judicial Retention Elections, the chief election officer shall inform the filing entity by postal mail or, if requested by the filing entity, by electronic mail:

(i)  that the financial statement is due;

(ii)  of the date that the financial statement is due; and

(iii)  of the penalty for failing to file the financial statement.

(b)  The chief election officer is not required to provide notice:

(i)  to a candidate or political party of the financial statement that is due before the candidate's or political party's political convention;

(ii)  of a financial statement due in connection with a public hearing for an initiative under the requirements of Section 20A-7-204.1; or

(iii)  to a corporation or labor organization, as defined in Section 20A-11-1501.

(2)  A filing entity shall electronically file a financial statement via electronic mail or the Internet according to specifications established by the chief election officer.

(3) (a)  A financial statement is considered timely filed if it is received by the chief election officer’s office before the close of regular office hours on the date that it is due.

(b)  A chief election officer may extend the time in which a filing entity is required to file a financial statement if a filing entity notifies the chief election officer of the existence of an extenuating circumstance that is outside the control of the filing entity.

(4)  Notwithstanding any provision of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, the lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  make each campaign finance statement filed by a candidate available for public inspection and copying no later than one business day after the statement is filed; and

(b)  post an electronic copy or the contents of each financial statement in a searchable format on a website established by the lieutenant governor:

(i)  for campaign finance statements submitted to the lieutenant governor under the requirements of Section 10-3-208 or Section 17-16-6.5, no later than seven business days after the date of receipt of the campaign finance statement; or

(ii)  for a summary report or interim report filed under the requirements of this chapter or Chapter 12, Part 2, Judicial Retention Elections, no later than three business days after the date the summary report or interim report is electronically filed.

(5)  If a municipality, under Section 10-3-208, or a county, under Section 17-16-6.5, elects to provide campaign finance disclosure on its own website, rather than through the lieutenant governor, the website established by the lieutenant governor shall contain a link or other access point to the municipality or county website.



Amended by Chapter 369, 2012 General Session

